Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 1 Water Quality Control Act
69-3-105. Duties and authority of the board. [See contingent amendment to subdivision (e)(1)(C) and the Compiler’s Notes.]

The board has and shall exercise the power, duty, and responsibility to establish and adopt standards of quality for all waters of the state.

The general assembly recognizes that, due to various factors, no single standard of quality and purity is applicable to all waters of the state or to different segments of the same waters. It also recognizes the suitability of certain geologic formations for the placement of fluids and other substances through underground injection; provided, that adequate protection can be afforded the geologic formations. The board shall classify all waters of the state and adopt water quality standards pursuant to such classifications. Such classifications shall be made in accordance with the declaration of policy and purpose in § 69-3-102. In preparing the classification of waters and the standards of quality mentioned above, the board shall give consideration to:

The size, depth, surface area covered, volume, direction and rate of flow, stream gradient, and temperature of the water;

The character of the land bordering, overlying or underlying the waters of the state and its particular suitability for particular uses, with a view to conserving the value of that land, encouraging the most appropriate use of the same for economic, residential, agricultural, industrial, recreational and conservation purposes;

The past, present, and potential uses of the waters for transportation, domestic and industrial consumption, recreation, fishing and fish culture, fire prevention, the disposal of sewage, industrial and other wastes, and other possible uses.

The state water quality plan provided for in subsection (e) shall contain standards of quality and purity for each of the various classes of water in accordance with the best interests of the public. In preparing such standards, the board shall give due consideration to all physical, chemical, biological, bacteriological, or radiological properties that may be necessary for preserving the quality and purity of the waters of the state.

The board may amend and revise such standards and classifications, including revisions to improve and upgrade the quality of water.

The board has and shall exercise the power, duty, and responsibility to adopt, modify, repeal, promulgate after due notice and enforce rules and regulations that the board deems necessary for the proper administration of this part, the prevention, control, and abatement of pollution, or the modification of classifications and the upgrading of the standards of quality in accordance with subsection (a).

The board has and shall exercise the power, duty, and responsibility to adopt, modify, repeal, and promulgate, after due notice, all necessary rules and regulations for the purpose of controlling the discharge of sewage, other wastes, and other substances from any boats.

Prior to classifying or reclassifying waters of the state, or adopting, amending, or revising standards of quality for waters of the state, or promulgating, adopting, modifying, or repealing rules and regulations, or adopting, amending, or revising water quality plans, or area-wide waste treatment plans, the board shall conduct, or cause to be conducted, public hearings in connection therewith. Notice of any public hearing shall be given not less than thirty (30) days before the date of such hearing and shall state the date, time, and place of hearing, and the subject of the hearing. Any such notice shall be published at least once in one (1) newspaper of general public circulation circulated within the area of the state in which the water affected is located. Any person within the area of the state in which the water affected is located may contact the board and request to be placed on a notification registry, which includes such person's full name, mailing address, and telephone number. The board shall notify in writing all persons on such notification registry as to the date, time, and place of hearing, and the subject of the hearing, ten (10) days before the hearing. Any person who desires to be heard relative to water quality matters at any such public hearing shall give notice thereof in writing to the board on or before the first date set for the hearing. The board is authorized to set reasonable time limits for the oral presentation of views by any person at any such public hearing.

The board has and shall exercise the power, duty, and responsibility to proceed without delay to formulate and adopt a state water quality plan, which shall consist of the following:

Water quality standards as outlined in subsection (a);

Water quality objectives for planning and operation of water resource development projects, for water quality control activities, and for the improvement of existing water quality;

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and see Compiler’s Notes.]

Other principles and guidelines deemed essential by the board of water quality, oil and gas; and

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler’s Notes.]

Other principles and guidelines deemed essential by the board; and

A program of implementation for those waters that do not presently meet established water quality standards.

The state water quality plan shall be reviewed at least biennially and may be revised. During the process of formulating or revising the state water quality plan, the board shall consult with and carefully evaluate the recommendations of concerned federal, state, and local agencies.

The board has and shall exercise the power, duty, and responsibility to:

Hear appeals as specified in subsection (i) from administrative judges' orders assessing penalties or damages, or issuing, denying, revoking or modifying a permit; and

Affirm, modify, or revoke such orders, as specified in subsection (i).

The board has and shall exercise the power, duty, and responsibility to require the technical secretary to carry out surveys, research, and investigations into all aspects of water use and water quality.

The board has and shall exercise the power, duty, and responsibility to adopt, modify, repeal, and promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the purpose of establishing and administering a comprehensive permit program that will enable the department of environment and conservation to be designated by the United States environmental protection agency as authorized to issue permits under the national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) established by § 402 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, P.L. 92-500 (33 U.S.C. § 1342).

Such rules and regulations shall include provisions for:

Forms and procedures for permit applications;

Public notice and opportunity for public hearing on permit applications;

Promulgation and application in permits of effluent standards and limitations, water quality standards, schedules of compliance, and such other terms and conditions as are necessary to implement this part;

Monitoring and inspecting effluent discharges or treatment facilities and recording and reporting the results;

Enforcement of this part, rules and regulations promulgated under it, and the terms and conditions of permits; and

Adoption and enforcement of permits that have been issued by the United States environmental protection agency pursuant to § 402 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, P.L. 92-500.

A petition for permit appeal may be filed by the permit applicant or by any aggrieved person who participated in the public comment period or gave testimony at a formal public hearing whose appeal is based upon any of the issues that were provided to the commissioner in writing during the public comment period or in testimony at a formal public hearing on the permit application. Additionally, for those permits for which the department gives public notice of a draft permit, any permit applicant or aggrieved person may base a permit appeal on any material change to conditions in the final permit from those in the draft, unless the material change has been subject to additional opportunity for public comment. Any petition for permit appeal under this subsection (i) shall be filed with the board within thirty (30) days after public notice of the commissioner's decision to issue or deny the permit. Notwithstanding § 4-5-223 or § 69-3-118(a), or any other law to the contrary, this subsection (i) and the established procedures of Tennessee's antidegradation statement, found in the rules promulgated by the department, shall be the exclusive means for obtaining administrative review of the commissioner's issuance or denial of a permit. When such a petition is timely filed, the procedure for conducting the contested case shall be in accordance with § 69-3-110(a).

The board has and shall exercise the power, duty, and responsibility to adopt, modify, repeal, and promulgate all necessary rules and regulations that the board deems necessary relating to the underground placement of fluids and other substances that do or may affect the waters of the state.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title to the contrary, waters that are in areas of swamped-out bottomland hardwoods or swamped-out cropland shall be classified as protective of wildlife and humans that may come into contact with them, and shall maintain standards applicable to all downstream waters, but shall not be classified for the protection of fish and aquatic life.

As used in this subsection (k):

“Swamped-out bottomland hardwood” means an area subject to inundation or ponding of surface water that has resulted, or is resulting, in timber mortality or stress. The term does not include areas with a dominance of cypress or tupelo gum trees or areas in which the majority of the timber died prior to 1970; and

“Swamped-out cropland” means an area that was previously in row crop cultivation or pasture, but can no longer be used for such purpose due to inundation or ponding of surface water. “Swamped-out cropland” does not include wetland areas that have not been cultivated or in pasture since 1970 because of inundation or ponding of surface water.

The board has and shall exercise the power to adopt rules creating a system of incentives for alternatives to discharges to surface waters, such as land application and beneficial reuse of the wastewater.

The commissioner shall develop and submit to the board proposed rules necessary for accurate and consistent wet weather conveyance determinations. These rules shall include at a minimum:

Standard procedures for making stream and wet weather conveyance determinations that take into consideration biology, geology, geomorphology, precipitation, hydrology and other scientifically based principles; and

A certification program for department staff and other persons who wish to become certified hydrologic professionals.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 5; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-328(a); Acts 1984, ch. 804, § 3; 1988, ch. 688, §§ 4, 8; 1991, ch. 123, § 1; 1992, ch. 693, § 1; 1998, ch. 643, § 1; 2005, ch. 355, § 1; 2007, ch. 362, § 36; 2009, ch. 271, § 2; 2009, ch. 464, § 3; 2013, ch. 181, §§ 13, 14; 2018, ch. 839, § 30.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 355, § 2 provided that the amendment of subsection (i) shall only apply to permit applications filed after June 7, 2005.

Acts 2009, ch. 454, § 3 provided that, within ninety (90) days of June 23, 2009, the commissioner shall develop and submit to the board proposed rules necessary for accurate and consistent wet weather conveyance determinations.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104 to substitute “board of water quality, oil and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

Acts 2013, ch.181, § 19 provided that for the purpose of construing the act in relation to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, the act shall be deemed to be procedural in nature. It is the intent of the general assembly that Acts 2013, chapter 181 and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act shall be complied with, however when in conflict, the provisions of Acts 2013, chapter 181 shall govern.

Acts 2013, ch. 181, § 20 provided that the act, which amended subsections (f) and (i), shall apply to all cases filed on or after July 1, 2013.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment deleted “of water quality, oil and gas” at the end of (e)(1)(C).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [Contingent. See Compiler’s Notes.]

Attorney General Opinions. Memorandum of agreement between division of solid waste management and division of water pollution control not a rule subject to Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, OAG 95-084, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 94 (8/15/95).

The water quality control board (now the board of water quality, oil and gas) has the authority to adopt rules that require applicants for individual aquatic resource alteration permits to evaluate practicable alternatives and to conduct an avoidance, minimization, and/or mitigation analysis for activities that will impact waters of the state as such requirements are in keeping with the public trust doctrine and the legislative policy of preserving and protecting the waters of the state from conditions of pollution, OAG 00-122, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 123 (7/21/00).

The Tennessee water quality control board (now the board of water quality, oil and gas) does not have authority to promulgate a rule that would authorize the commissioner of the Tennessee department of environment and conservation to issue stop work orders for construction activity that is being done without a required permit or in violation of a permit, OAG 01-105, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (6/27/01).

69-3-106. [Reserved.]

In addition to any power, duty, or responsibility given to the commissioner under this part, the commissioner has the power, duty, and responsibility to:

Exercise general supervision and control over the quality of all state waters, administer and enforce all laws relating to pollution of such waters, and administer and enforce this part, and all standards, policies, rules, and regulations promulgated under this part;

Administer oaths, issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance of witnesses and production of necessary data for all purposes of this part;

Bring suit in the name of the department for any violation of this part, seeking any remedy provided in this part, and any other statutory or common law remedy available for the control, prevention, and abatement of pollution;

Proceed against, as provided in this part, any owner or operator of any boat, located or operated on the waters of the state, that discharges or causes to be discharged any sewage, other wastes, or other substances into such waters in violation of this part or any rules or regulations promulgated under this part;

Make inspections and investigations, carry on research, or take such other action as may be necessary to carry out this part;

Enter or authorize the commissioner's agents to enter at all reasonable times upon any property other than dwelling places for the purpose of conducting investigations and studies or enforcing any of this part;

Advise, consult, cooperate, contract, and make other binding agreements with the various agencies of the federal government and with state and local administrative and governmental agencies, colleges and universities, or with any other persons;

In furtherance of this part, the commissioner may require any state or local agency to investigate and report on any matters involved in water quality control; provided, that the burden, including costs, of such reports shall bear a reasonable relationship to the need for the reports and the benefits to be obtained from the reports; and

The department has the authority, subject to approval by the governor, to enter into agreements with other states and the United States relative to prevention and control of pollution in interstate waters. This authority is not deemed to extend to the modification of any agreement with the state concluded by direct legislative act, but unless otherwise expressly provided, the department shall be the agency for the administration and enforcement of any such legislative agreement;

Apply for, accept, administer, and utilize loans and grants from the federal government, state government, and from any other sources, public or private, for prevention, abatement, and control of pollution of the waters of the state. The department is the water quality control agency for the state for the purpose of any federal water pollution control act;

Prepare, publish, and issue such printed pamphlets and bulletins as the department deems necessary for the dissemination of information to the public concerning its activities;

Require the submission of such plans, specifications, technical reports, and other information as deemed necessary to carry out this part or to carry out the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this part;

Be the administrative agent for the board and panel to carry out this part;

Make an annual report to the governor and the general assembly on the status of water quality, including a description of the plan, regulations in effect, and other pertinent information, together with any recommendations the commissioner may care to make;

Delegate to the director of the division with responsibility for water quality control any of the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the commissioner under this part, except the commissioner's powers, duties and responsibility as chair of the board;

Issue permits and variances pursuant to § 69-3-108;

Inspect waters of the state where good cause is shown that the public health is threatened by pollutants in the waters, and, upon verification by the commissioner, post or cause to be posted such signs as required to give notice to the public of the potential or actual dangers of specific uses of such waters or restrictions of uses of such waters;

Assess civil penalties in accordance with § 69-3-115;

Apply this part against any person who discharges into a publicly owned treatment works who is causing a violation of this part, or who is in violation of applicable pretreatment standards;

Impose such restrictions, including an immediate cessation of connections and line extensions, upon the expansion of any sewerage or wastewater system as are necessary to mitigate or prevent violations of this part;

Prepare a written report on stream bank erosion in Tennessee to be delivered to each member of the general assembly by January 15, 2000. Such report shall contain the following:

An examination of the causes of stream bank erosion;

The effectiveness of existing and new methods of bank protection;

An assessment of stream bank erosion in Tennessee; and

Any other matter the commissioner deems relevant to stream bank erosion that may be of concern to the general assembly;

Conduct, or cause to be conducted, demonstration projects, to the extent of available funds, of methods of bank stabilization and debris removal in streams in western Middle Tennessee to be done as soon as is practicable and a report shall be made to the general assembly after the performance of the chosen techniques has been observed through at least a full year;

Conduct, or cause to be conducted, a study or project comparing different techniques for stream bank stabilization and debris removal in streams in western Middle Tennessee to be done as soon as possible, either in conjunction with the project mentioned in subdivision (20), or separately;

Develop a program of public education regarding simple, practical and affordable techniques for cleaning debris from streams and for stabilizing stream banks, including field examples of activities permissible without permits and activities that may be accomplished if permits are obtained;

Produce a video by not later than January 1, 1999, that shows the above examples, explains the requirements of the law and rules for these activities, including the process of applying for a permit, and tells who to call for further assistance, which shall be distributed at no cost to public libraries and agricultural extension services;

Perform a thorough and ongoing study of, and prepare recommendations regarding options for, the protection of watersheds and the control of sources of pollution, in order to assure the future quality of potable drinking water supplies throughout the state. The department is authorized to use information and studies from state, federal, and local governments and other sources of reliable scientific data. Initial findings and recommendations shall be presented to the governor and the general assembly no later than February 1, 2007, and annually thereafter; and

Develop and submit to the board for comment proposed guidance that provides:

Instructions, examples and definitions based upon scientifically based principles for consistently and accurately making hydrologic determinations; and

Minimum qualifications for staff who are responsible for making or reviewing wet weather conveyance determinations.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 6; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; 1979, ch. 422, § 19; 1982, ch. 917, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-329; Acts 1984, ch. 804, § 5; 1988, ch. 688, §§ 5, 9; 1998, ch. 659, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 513, § 1; 2009, ch. 464, § 4.